New York, session 2025-2026, S3974.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 803 of the 2 correction law, as amended by section 37 of subpart B of part C of chap- 3 ter 62 of the laws of 2011, is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) Every person confined in an institution of the department or a 5 facility in the department of mental hygiene serving an indeterminate or 6 determinate sentence of imprisonment, except a person serving a sentence 7 with a maximum term of life imprisonment, may receive time allowance 8 against the term or maximum term of [his or her] such person's sentence 9 imposed by the court. Such allowances may be granted for good behavior 10 and efficient and willing performance of duties assigned or progress and 11 achievement in an assigned treatment program, and may be withheld, 12 forfeited or canceled in whole or in part for bad behavior, violation of 13 institutional rules or failure to perform properly in the duties or 14 program assigned. Such allowances shall not be withheld if a person 15 fails to complete a program because of circumstances beyond such 16 person's control. 17 § 2. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 803 of the correction 18 law, as amended by chapter 126 of the laws of 1987 and as designated by 19 chapter 738 of the laws of 2004, is amended to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00139-03-6 S. 3974--A 2 1 (a) Every person confined in an institution of the department or a 2 facility in the department of mental hygiene serving an indeterminate 3 sentence of imprisonment, except a person serving a sentence with a 4 maximum term of life imprisonment, may receive time allowance against 5 the maximum term or period of [his] such person's sentence not to exceed 6 in the aggregate one-third of the term or period imposed by the court. 7 Such allowances may be granted for good behavior and efficient and will- 8 ing performance of duties assigned or progress and achievement in an 9 assigned treatment program, and may be withheld, forfeited or canceled 10 in whole or in part for bad behavior, violation of institutional rules 11 or failure to perform properly in the duties or program assigned. Such 12 allowances shall not be withheld if a person fails to complete a program 13 because of circumstances beyond such person's control. 14 § 3. Subparagraph (iv) of paragraph (d) of subdivision 1 of section 15 803 of the correction law, as amended by section 1 of part EE of chapter 16 56 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 17 (iv) Such merit time allowance may be granted when an incarcerated 18 individual successfully participates in the work and treatment program 19 assigned pursuant to section eight hundred five of this article and when 20 such incarcerated individual obtains a general equivalency diploma, an 21 alcohol and substance abuse treatment certificate, a vocational trade 22 certificate following at least six months of vocational programming, at 23 least eighteen credits in a program registered by the state education 24 department from a degree-granting higher education institution or 25 performs at least four hundred hours of service as part of a community 26 work crew. The commissioner may designate additional programs and 27 achievements for which merit time may be granted. 28 Such allowance shall be withheld for any serious disciplinary infrac- 29 tion or upon a judicial determination that the person, while an incar- 30 cerated individual, commenced or continued a civil action, proceeding or 31 claim that was found to be frivolous as defined in subdivision (c) of 32 section eight thousand three hundred three-a of the civil practice law 33 and rules, or an order of a federal court pursuant to rule 11 of the 34 federal rules of civil procedure imposing sanctions in an action 35 commenced by a person, while an incarcerated individual, against a state 36 agency, officer or employee. Such allowance shall not be withheld if a 37 person fails to complete a program because of circumstances beyond the 38 control of such person. 39 § 4. Subparagraph (iv) of paragraph (d) of subdivision 1 of section 40 803 of the correction law, as separately amended by section 2 of chapter 41 242 and section 224-a of chapter 322 of the laws of 2021, is amended to 42 read as follows: 43 (iv) Such merit time allowance may be granted when an incarcerated 44 individual successfully participates in the work and treatment program 45 assigned pursuant to section eight hundred five of this article and when 46 such incarcerated individual obtains a general equivalency diploma, an 47 alcohol and substance abuse treatment certificate, a vocational trade 48 certificate following at least six months of vocational programming, at 49 least eighteen credits in a program registered by the state education 50 department from a degree-granting higher education institution or 51 performs at least four hundred hours of service as part of a community 52 work crew. 53 Such allowance shall be withheld for any serious disciplinary infrac- 54 tion or upon a judicial determination that the person, while an incar- 55 cerated individual, commenced or continued a civil action, proceeding or 56 claim that was found to be frivolous as defined in subdivision (c) of S. 3974--A 3 1 section eight thousand three hundred three-a of the civil practice law 2 and rules, or an order of a federal court pursuant to rule 11 of the 3 federal rules of civil procedure imposing sanctions in an action 4 commenced by a person, while an incarcerated individual, against a state 5 agency, officer or employee. Such allowance shall not be withheld if a 6 person fails to complete a program because of circumstances beyond the 7 control of such person. 8 § 5. Subdivision 1 of section 804 of the correction law, as amended by 9 chapter 145 of the laws of 1976, is amended to read as follows: 10 1. Every person confined in an institution serving a definite sentence 11 of imprisonment may receive time allowances as discretionary reductions 12 of the term of [his] such person's sentence not to exceed in the aggre- 13 gate one-third of the term imposed by the court. Such allowances may be 14 granted for good behavior and efficient and willing performance of 15 duties assigned or progress and achievement in an assigned treatment 16 program, and may be withheld, forfeited or cancelled in whole or in part 17 for bad behavior, violation of institutional rules or failure to perform 18 properly in the duties or program assigned. Such allowances shall not be 19 withheld, forfeited or cancelled in whole or in part for a person's 20 failure to complete an assigned program due to circumstances beyond the 21 control of such person. 22 § 6. Section 805 of the correction law, as amended by section 226 of 23 chapter 322 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 24 § 805. Earned eligibility program. Persons committed to the custody of 25 the department under an indeterminate or determinate sentence of impri- 26 sonment shall be assigned a work and treatment program as soon as prac- 27 ticable. No earlier than two months prior to the incarcerated individ- 28 ual's eligibility to be paroled pursuant to subdivision one of section 29 70.40 of the penal law, the commissioner shall review the incarcerated 30 individual's institutional record to determine whether [he or she] such 31 incarcerated individual has complied with the assigned program. Credit 32 for such assigned program shall not be withheld if a person fails to 33 complete a program because of circumstances beyond such person's 34 control. If the commissioner determines that the incarcerated individual 35 has successfully participated in the program [he or she] such commis- 36 sioner may issue the incarcerated individual a certificate of earned 37 eligibility. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an incarcerated 38 individual who is serving a sentence with a minimum term of not more 39 than eight years and who has been issued a certificate of earned eligi- 40 bility, shall be granted parole release at the expiration of [his or 41 her] such incarcerated individual's minimum term or as authorized by 42 subdivision four of section eight hundred sixty-seven of this chapter 43 unless the board of parole determines that there is a reasonable proba- 44 bility that, if such incarcerated individual is released, [he or she] 45 such incarcerated individual will not live and remain at liberty without 46 violating the law and that [his or her] the release of such incarcerated 47 individual is not compatible with the welfare of society. Any action by 48 the commissioner pursuant to this section shall be deemed a judicial 49 function and shall not be reviewable if done in accordance with law. 50 § 7. Section 805 of the correction law, as amended by section 226-a of 51 chapter 322 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 52 § 805. Earned eligibility program. Persons committed to the custody of 53 the department under an indeterminate sentence of imprisonment shall be 54 assigned a work and treatment program as soon as practicable. No earlier 55 than two months prior to the expiration of an incarcerated individual's 56 minimum period of imprisonment, the commissioner shall review the incar- S. 3974--A 4 1 cerated individual's institutional record to determine whether [he or 2 she] such incarcerated individual has complied with the assigned 3 program. Credit for such assigned program shall not be withheld if a 4 person fails to complete a program because of circumstances beyond such 5 person's control. If the commissioner determines that the incarcerated 6 individual has successfully participated in the program [he or she] such 7 commissioner may issue the incarcerated individual a certificate of 8 earned eligibility. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an 9 incarcerated individual who is serving a sentence with a minimum term of 10 not more than six years and who has been issued a certificate of earned 11 eligibility, shall be granted parole release at the expiration of [his 12 or her] such incarcerated individual's minimum term or as authorized by 13 subdivision four of section eight hundred sixty-seven of this chapter 14 unless the board of parole determines that there is a reasonable proba- 15 bility that, if such incarcerated individual is released, [he or she] 16 such incarcerated individual will not live and remain at liberty without 17 violating the law and that [his or her] the release of such incarcerated 18 individual is not compatible with the welfare of society. Any action by 19 the commissioner pursuant to this section shall be deemed a judicial 20 function and shall not be reviewable if done in accordance with law. 21 § 8. Subdivision 5 of section 806 of the correction law, as amended by 22 chapter 322 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 23 5. No person shall have the right to demand or require presumptive 24 release authorized by this section. The commissioner may revoke at any 25 time an incarcerated individual's scheduled presumptive release pursuant 26 to this section for any disciplinary infraction committed by the incar- 27 cerated individual or for any failure to continue to participate 28 successfully in any assigned work and treatment program after the 29 certificate of earned eligibility has been awarded except that any such 30 failure to continue to participate in an assigned work or treatment 31 program shall not be grounds for revocation of presumptive release if 32 such failure is due to circumstances beyond the incarcerated person's 33 control. The commissioner may deny presumptive release to any incarcer- 34 ated individual whenever the commissioner determines that such release 35 may not be consistent with the safety of the community or the welfare of 36 the incarcerated individual. Any action by the commissioner pursuant to 37 this section shall be deemed a judicial function and shall not be 38 reviewable if done in accordance with law. 39 § 9. This act shall take effect immediately; provided that the amend- 40 ments to paragraph (a) and subparagraph (iv) of paragraph (d) of subdi- 41 vision 1 of section 803 of the correction law made by sections one and 42 three of this act shall be subject to the expiration and reversion of 43 such section pursuant to subdivision d of section 74 of chapter 3 of the 44 laws of 1995, as amended, when upon such date the provisions of sections 45 two and four of this act shall take effect; provided, further, that the 46 amendments to section 805 of the correction law made by section six of 47 this act shall be subject to the expiration and reversion of such 48 section pursuant to subdivision d of section 74 of chapter 3 of the laws 49 of 1995, as amended, when upon such date the provisions of section seven 50 of this act shall take effect; and provided, further, that the amend- 51 ments to subdivision 5 of section 806 of the correction law made by 52 section eight of this act shall not affect the repeal of such section 53 and shall be deemed repealed therewith.